Illinois, session 104th, HB2994.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Confidentiality Act is amended by changing 6Section 4 as follows: 7    (740 ILCS 110/4)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 804)8    Sec. 4. (a) The following persons shall be entitled, upon 9request, to inspect and copy a recipient's record or any part 10thereof:11        (1) the parent or guardian of a recipient who is under 12    12 years of age;13        (2) the recipient if he is 12 years of age or older;14        (3) the parent or guardian of a recipient who is at 15    least 12 but under 18 years, if the recipient is informed 16    and does not object or if the therapist does not find that 17    there are compelling reasons for denying the access. The 18    parent or guardian who is denied access by either the 19    recipient or the therapist may petition a court for access 20    to the record. Nothing in this paragraph is intended to 21    prohibit the parent or guardian of a recipient who is at 22    least 12 but under 18 years from requesting and receiving 23    the following information: current physical and mental   HB2994 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11359 JRC 21447 b1    condition, diagnosis, treatment needs, services provided, 2    and services needed, including medication, if any;3        (3.5) the parent or guardian of a minor, regardless of 4    the minor's age, if the minor is involved in special 5    education services under Section 14-1.11 of the School 6    Code, and only for the purpose of inspecting and copying a 7    record of the specific mental health or developmental 8    services that the parent or guardian consented to on the 9    recipient's behalf for special education services; or the 10    designated representative of a student over the age of 18 11    involved in special education services under Section 12    14-6.10 of the School Code the personal representative 13    under HIPAA, 45 CFR 164.502(g), of a recipient, regardless 14    of the age of the recipient;15        (4) the guardian of a recipient who is 18 years or 16    older;17        (5) an attorney or guardian ad litem who represents a 18    minor 12 years of age or older in any judicial or 19    administrative proceeding, provided that the court or 20    administrative hearing officer has entered an order 21    granting the attorney this right;22        (6) an agent appointed under a recipient's power of 23    attorney for health care or for property, when the power 24    of attorney authorizes the access;25        (7) an attorney-in-fact appointed under the Mental 26    Health Treatment Preference Declaration Act; or  HB2994 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11359 JRC 21447 b1        (8) any person in whose care and custody the recipient 2    has been placed pursuant to Section 3-811 of the Mental 3    Health and Developmental Disabilities Code. 4    (b) Assistance in interpreting the record may be provided 5without charge and shall be provided if the person inspecting 6the record is under 18 years of age. However, access may in no 7way be denied or limited if the person inspecting the record 8refuses the assistance. A reasonable fee may be charged for 9duplication of a record. However, when requested to do so in 10writing by any indigent recipient, the custodian of the 11records shall provide at no charge to the recipient, or to the 12Guardianship and Advocacy Commission, the agency designated by 13the Governor under Section 1 of the Protection and Advocacy 14for Persons with Developmental Disabilities Act or to any 15other not-for-profit agency whose primary purpose is to 16provide free legal services or advocacy for the indigent and 17who has received written authorization from the recipient 18under Section 5 of this Act to receive his records, one copy of 19any records in its possession whose disclosure is authorized 20under this Act.21    (c) Any person entitled to access to a record under this 22Section may submit a written statement concerning any disputed 23or new information, which statement shall be entered into the 24record. Whenever any disputed part of a record is disclosed, 25any submitted statement relating thereto shall accompany the 26disclosed part. Additionally, any person entitled to access   HB2994 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 11359 JRC 21447 b1may request modification of any part of the record which he 2believes is incorrect or misleading. If the request is 3refused, the person may seek a court order to compel 4modification.5    (d) Whenever access or modification is requested, the 6request and any action taken thereon shall be noted in the 7recipient's record.8    (e) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to affect 9the protection of or access to records under the Illinois 10School Student Records Act or the federal Individuals with 11Disabilities Education Act. 12(Source: P.A. 103-474, eff. 1-1-24.)